Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 9 Code Revision Commission

Cross references.

Provisions regarding enactment of Official Code of Georgia Annotated, T. 1., C. 1.

Code Commission notes.

Code sections comprising a new Chapter 9 of this title were added by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1 (§§

28-9-1

through

28-9-4

), Ga. L. 1985, p. 202, § 1 (§

28-9-5

), and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2 (§§

28-9-1

through 28-9-7). Because Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2 is the latest of the three Acts, in 1985 the chapter enacted by that Act was redesignated as Chapter 10 pursuant to Code Section

28-9-5

, and the Code sections enacted by that Act were redesignated as Code Sections

28-10-1

through

28-10-7

.

Editor’s notes.

Code Section 28-9-5 was enacted by an Act other than the Act which enacted
Code Sections 28-9-1 through
28-9-4. See the Editor’s notes to
Code Section 28-9-5.

28-9-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Code” means the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, any unannotated version thereof, or any codification of the laws of the State of Georgia which is a successor to or replacement of such Code, and such term shall include all statutory provisions, annotations, research references, notes, indexes, tables, constitutions, cross-references, pocket parts, and other material related to or included in such Code.

“Commission” means the Code Revision Commission originally created pursuant to H.R. No. 217-838 adopted by the General Assembly at the 1977 regular session, as amended, and as re-created by Code Section 28-9-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1.

28-9-2.
Creation of the Code Revision Commission; membership, term of office, and vacancies; expenses and allowances; ratification of previous actions and contracts.

There is created the Code Revision Commission, to be composed of 15 members as follows:

The Speaker of the House of Representatives;

Four members of the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives for terms of office coinciding with their terms as members of the House of Representatives;

The President of the Senate;

Four members of the Senate to be appointed by the President of the Senate for terms of office coinciding with their terms as members of the Senate; and

Five members of the State Bar of Georgia to be appointed by the president of the State Bar of Georgia for terms of office of one year each and until their successors are appointed, with such terms beginning on the second Monday of January of each year, provided that one such member shall be a judge or senior judge of the superior courts and one such member shall be a district attorney. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the president of the State Bar of Georgia is authorized to appoint an official or employee of any branch of the state government, a county, municipality, board of education, or other political subdivision if such person is a member of the State Bar of Georgia; and any person so appointed is authorized to serve as a member of the Code Revision Commission.

Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the commission, whether by the death, resignation, or failure of a member to hold office or membership in the State Bar of Georgia, shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the appointment of the member whose seat is vacant. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.

While engaged in the duties of the commission, all members shall receive the expenses and allowances authorized by law for legislative members of interim legislative committees. The judge or senior judge of the superior courts, the district attorney, and any member of the State Bar of Georgia who is also an official or employee of the executive or judicial branch of state government shall receive such expenses and allowances from state funds from which they are otherwise compensated. Any other funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and any contract executed pursuant to this chapter or any prior resolution of the General Assembly shall come from the funds provided for the legislative branch of state government.

The members of the Code Revision Commission created pursuant to H.R. No. 217-838 adopted by the General Assembly at the 1977 regular session and as amended by H.R. No. 447-1274 adopted by the General Assembly at the 1978 regular session who are serving as members of the commission on April 1, 1985, shall continue in office as members until the second Monday in January, 1987, in the case of legislative members or until the second Monday in January, 1986, in the case of members appointed by the president of the State Bar of Georgia, at which time their terms shall expire and their successors shall be appointed as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. All actions taken by such commission and all contracts entered into by such commission are ratified and confirmed. The commission created by this Code section shall be deemed to be a continuation of the commission created pursuant to such resolutions.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1.

28-9-3.
Powers and duties of commission generally.

The commission is authorized:

To select and contract with a publisher to conduct a revision, codification, or recodification of the Code and laws of Georgia, provided that any such contract requiring the expenditure of state funds shall be contingent upon the General Assembly appropriating the necessary funds therefor;

To formulate with the publisher all the details associated with the codification or recodification of the Code and laws of Georgia;

To take such action as is necessary to effectuate Code revision;

To carry out the functions required of it in any contract entered into between the commission and the publisher;

To negotiate and establish the price at which the Code or any volume, replacement volume, pocket part, index, or related material may be sold to governmental or private purchasers, or both;

To determine when volumes of the Code may be revised and republished;

To adopt and implement a system for arranging, numbering, and designating material within the Code;

To adopt rules of style and grammar for use in the Code;

To prepare, or provide for the preparation of, and to include in the Code such annotations, historical notes, research references, notes on law review articles, cross-references, summaries of the opinions of the Attorney General of Georgia, editor’s notes, Code Revision Commission notes, comments, commentaries, rules and regulations, indexes, tables, and other material as the commission determines to be useful to users of the Code; provided, however, that such supplementary matter included in the Code shall bear no additional weight or effect and shall not be construed to have the imprimatur of the General Assembly by virtue of its inclusion in the Code;

To provide for the publication of annotated or unannotated versions of the Code, or both;

To provide for the publication of volumes containing the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of the State of Georgia, and an index of local and special laws, general laws of local application, and home rule ordinances;

To review, approve, or disapprove the work of the publisher in preparing, supplementing, indexing, or revising state content included in the Code or any volume, pocket part, or portion thereof; provided, however, that the commission shall have no oversight of the work of the publisher in preparing, supplementing, indexing, or revising supplementary content included by the publisher in accordance with the contract between the publisher and the commission;

To grant exclusive or nonexclusive publication and sales rights to the Code or portions thereof to the publisher;

To grant rights to governmental agencies and others to reprint and distribute portions or excerpts of the Code;

To negotiate and grant licenses or rights, on behalf of the state, to use such material upon such terms and conditions as the commission shall determine to be in the best interest of the state;

To seek the advice and assistance of members and committees of the State Bar of Georgia, the law schools of the state, the Attorney General or members of his staff, state and local public officials and employees, and others with expertise or interest in the laws of Georgia;

To provide for the preparation and introduction of one or more bills to revise, modernize, and correct errors or omissions in the Code or the laws of Georgia or to repeal portions of the Code or laws which have become obsolete, have been declared to be unconstitutional, or have been preempted or superseded by subsequent state or federal laws;

To provide for procedures for the implementation or execution of its powers and duties; and

To take such other action or exercise such additional powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the duties and powers of the commission, or any contract entered into under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-9-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 4/SB 238.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (9); in paragraph (12), inserted “state content included in” in the middle, and added the proviso at the end; and deleted “register the copyright claim in all materials in the Code and any supplements thereto, to protect, enforce, and preserve all claims in such materials, to bring and defend actions in any court in connection therewith, and to” following “To” in paragraph (15).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54(d)/HB 79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “For purposes of publishing volumes, replacement volumes, and supplements to the Official Code of Georgia Annotated pursuant to Chapter 9 of Title 28: legislation enacted at the same session of the General Assembly and amending the same statutory provision shall be considered in pari materia, and full effect shall be given to each if that is possible; Acts enacted during the same session shall be treated as conflicting with each other only to the extent that they cannot be given effect simultaneously; in the event of such a conflict, the latest enactment, as determined by the order in which bills became law with or without the approval of the Governor, shall control to the extent of the conflict unless the latest enactment contains a provision expressly ceding control in such an event; and language carried forward unchanged in one amendatory Act shall not be read as conflicting with changed language contained in another Act passed during the same session.” This provision was later codified by Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340, as subsection (b) of
Code Section 28-9-5.

For Acts reenacting the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, see the Editor’s notes to
§

1-1-1

.

Law reviews.

For discussion of the work of the Code Revision Commission in making the Code, see 18 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1982).

For article, “

Code Revision Commission v. Public.Resource.Org

and the Fight Over Copyright Protection for Annotations and Commentary,” see
54 Ga. L. Rev. 111 (2019).

28-9-4.
Commission staff.

The Office of Legislative Counsel shall serve as staff for the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1.

Law reviews.

For discussion of history, staffing, procedures, and duties of the Office of Legislative Counsel, see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 114 (1987).

28-9-5.
Publication of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated; authority to make corrections and editorial changes; effect of changes; treatment of multiple amendments; preparation and introduction of legislation reenacting and correcting Code; effect.

The Code Revision Commission shall provide for the publication of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated and any pocket parts, supplements, revised volumes, or recodifications thereof. In compiling, editing, arranging, and preparing the Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly for such publication and without altering the sense, meaning, or effect of such Acts and resolutions, the commission is authorized to take any of the following actions with respect to statutory text, arrangement, and numbering:

Correct the spelling of words;

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

Substitute the proper Code section number, chapter number, or other number or designation for the terms “this Act,” “the preceding Code section,” and similar words or phrases;

Renumber, redesignate, and rearrange chapters, articles, parts, subparts, Code sections, or any combination or portion thereof;

Change cross-reference numbers to agree with renumbered chapters, Code sections, or portions of the Code;

Substitute the proper calendar date for “the effective date of this chapter” and other phrases of similar import;

Strike out figures if they are merely a repetition of written words or vice versa, or substitute figures for written words or vice versa for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest errors in references to laws;

Correct inaccurate references to the titles of officers, the names of departments or other agencies of the state, local governments, or the federal government, and the short titles of other laws and make such other name changes as are necessary to be consistent with the laws currently in effect;

Rearrange definitions in alphabetical order;

Insert or delete hyphens in words so as to follow correct grammatical usage;

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

Change nouns from the singular to the plural or vice versa for purposes of style and grammar; and

Change punctuation for purposes of uniformity and consistency of style.

Any change or correction made by the Code Revision Commission pursuant to its authority under this subsection shall not become the law of the State of Georgia if such change or correction results in an alteration of the meaning, sense, or effect of the Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly, even though such change or correction may have been included in a pocket part, supplement, or revised volume of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated which has been reenacted by a bill authorized by subsection (c) of this Code section.

For purposes of publishing volumes, replacement volumes, and supplements to the Official Code of Georgia Annotated pursuant to this chapter: legislation enacted at the same session of the General Assembly and amending the same statutory provision shall be considered in pari materia, and full effect shall be given to each if that is possible; Acts enacted during the same session shall be treated as conflicting with each other only to the extent that they cannot be given effect simultaneously; in the event of such a conflict, the latest enactment, as determined by the order in which bills became Acts with or without the approval of the Governor, shall control to the extent of the conflict unless the latest enactment contains a provision expressly ceding control in such an event; and language carried forward unchanged in one amendatory Act shall not be read as conflicting with changed language contained in another Act passed during the same session.

The Code Revision Commission shall prepare and have introduced at each regular session of the General Assembly one or more bills to reenact and make corrections in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, portions thereof, and the laws as contained in the Code and any pocket part, supplements, and revised volumes thereof. Except as otherwise provided by general law, such reenactment of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated shall have the effect of adopting and giving force and effect of law to all the statutory text and numbering as contained in such volumes, pocket parts, and supplements, including but not limited to provisions as published therein in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 202, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 28; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 28/HB 90; Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 5/SB 238.

Code Commission notes.

The last sentence of current subsection (c) of this Code section regarding the effect of reenactment of the Code was added by Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340, in immediate response to (and in rejection of) footnote 3 of the majority opinion in Rutter v. Rutter,

294 Ga. 1

,

749 S.E.2d 657

(2013).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added “take any of the following actions with respect to statutory text, arrangement, and numbering” at the end of the introductory language in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

The Act which enacted this Code section was signed on the same day as, but subsequent to, the Act which enacted Code Sections

28-9-1

through

28-9-4

. Section 2 of the Act which enacted this Code section provided that this Code section would be designated “§

28-1-16

” in the event that Ga. L. 1985, p. 197 (enacting §§

28-9-1

through

28-9-4

) was not enacted at the 1985 session. Ga. L. 1985, p. 197 was signed into law effective February 12, 1985.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54(d)/HB 79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “For purposes of publishing volumes, replacement volumes, and supplements to the Official Code of Georgia Annotated pursuant to Chapter 9 of Title 28: legislation enacted at the same session of the General Assembly and amending the same statutory provision shall be considered in pari materia, and full effect shall be given to each if that is possible; Acts enacted during the same session shall be treated as conflicting with each other only to the extent that they cannot be given effect simultaneously; in the event of such a conflict, the latest enactment, as determined by the order in which bills became law with or without the approval of the Governor, shall control to the extent of the conflict unless the latest enactment contains a provision expressly ceding control in such an event; and language carried forward unchanged in one amendatory Act shall not be read as conflicting with changed language contained in another Act passed during the same session.” This provision was later codified by Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340, as subsection (b) of Code Section 28-9-5.

For Acts reenacting the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, see the Editor’s notes to
§

1-1-1

.